Nevada, session 83, AB42.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 422.2369 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
422.2369 1. Before adopting, amending or repealing any
regulation or policy for the administration of a program of public
assistance or any other program for which the Division is
responsible, the Administrator must give [at] :
(a) At least 3 business days’ notice of the intended action, if
the intended action:
(1) Is required to ensure the Division remains in
compliance with federal or state law; or
(2) Will result in an expansion of services or benefits; or
(b) At least 30 days’ notice of the intended action [.] , for all
intended actions not described in paragraph (a).
2. The Administrator may adopt a regulation or policy, or an
amendment or repeal thereof, that applies retroactively for the
administration of a program of public assistance or any other
program for which the Division is responsible if:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(a) Retroactive application of the regulation or policy is
necessary to ensure compliance with federal or state law; and
(b) The regulation or policy, or amendment or repeal thereof,
clearly states that it will be applied retroactively and the date to
which it will be applied retroactively.
3. The notice of intent to act upon a regulation or policy must:
(a) Include a statement of the need for and purpose of the
proposed regulation [,] or policy, or the amendment or repeal
thereof, and either the terms or substance of the proposed regulation
or policy, or amendment or repeal thereof, or a description of the
subjects and issues involved, and of the time when, the place where
and the manner in which interested persons may present their views
thereon.
(b) Include a statement identifying the entities that may be
financially affected by the proposed regulation or policy, or
amendment or repeal thereof, and the potential financial impact, if
any, upon local government.
(c) State each address at which the text of the proposed
regulation or policy, or amendment or repeal thereof, may be
inspected and copied.
(d) Be mailed to all persons who have requested in writing that
they be placed upon a mailing list, which must be kept by the
Administrator for that purpose.
[3.] 4. All interested persons must be afforded a reasonable
opportunity to submit data, views or arguments upon a proposed
regulation [,] or policy, or amendment or repeal thereof, orally or
in writing. The Administrator shall consider fully all oral and
written submissions relating to the proposed regulation [.] or policy,
or amendment or repeal thereof.
[4.] 5. The Administrator shall keep, retain and make available
for public inspection written minutes and an audio recording or
transcript of each public hearing held pursuant to this section in the
manner provided in NRS 241.035. A copy of the minutes or audio
recordings must be made available to a member of the public upon
request at no charge pursuant to NRS 241.035.
[5.] 6. An objection to any regulation or policy, or amendment
or repeal thereof, on the ground of noncompliance with the
procedural requirements of this section may not be made more than
2 years after its effective date.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)